Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1757
Direction of credit union affairs.

The credit union shall be under the direction of a board of directors, a supervisory committee, and when provided by the bylaws, a credit committee.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 57.